California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(1) The Health Education Account, which shall only be available for appropriation for programs for the prevention and reduction of tobacco use, primarily among children, through school and
 community health education programs. Revenues from the Health Education Account shall not be used to match federal funds for any purpose.

(2) The Hospital Services Account, which shall only be available for appropriation for payment to public and private hospitals licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code for the treatment of hospital patients who cannot afford to pay for that treatment and for whom payment for hospital services will not be made through private coverage or by any program funded in whole by the federal government.

(3) The Physician Services Account, which shall only be available for appropriation for payment to physicians for services to patients who cannot afford to pay for those services, and for whom payment for physician services will not be made through private coverage or by any program funded in whole by the federal
 government.

(4) The Research Account, which shall only be available for appropriation for tobacco-related disease research. Revenues from the Public Research Account shall not be used to match federal funds for any purpose.

(5) The Public Resources Account, which shall only be available for appropriation in equal amounts for both of the following:

(A) Programs to protect, restore, enhance, or maintain fish, waterfowl, and wildlife habitat on an equally funded basis.

(B) Programs to enhance state and local park and recreation resources.

(6) The Unallocated Account, which shall be available for appropriation for any purpose specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 14, Sec. 2.   Effective June 17, 2005.   Applicable from July 1, 2004, as provided in Sec. 4 of Ch. 14.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 1988, by initiative Prop. 99.)
-------------------------------------------

30123.

(a) In addition to the tax imposed upon the distribution of cigarettes by this chapter, there shall be imposed upon every distributor a tax upon the distribution of cigarettes at the rate of twelve and one-half mills ($0.0125) for each cigarette distributed.

(b) There shall be imposed upon every distributor a tax upon the distribution of tobacco products, based on the wholesale cost of these
 products, at a tax rate, as determined annually by the State Board of Equalization, which is equivalent to the combined rate of tax imposed on cigarettes by subdivision (a) and the other provisions of this part.

(c) The wholesale cost used to calculate the amount of tax due under subdivision (b) does not include the wholesale cost of tobacco products that were returned by a customer during the same reporting period in which the tobacco products were distributed, when the distributor refunds the entire amount the customer paid for the tobacco products either in cash or credit. For purposes of this subdivision, refund or credit of the entire amount shall be deemed to be given when the purchase price less rehandling and restocking costs is refunded or credited to the customer. The amount withheld for rehandling and restocking costs may be a percentage of the sales price determined by the average cost of rehandling and restocking returned
 merchandise during the previous accounting cycle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 426, Sec. 2.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 1988, by initiative Prop. 99.)
-------------------------------------------

30124.

(a) With the exception of payments of refunds made pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 30361) of Chapter 6, and reimbursement of the State Board of Equalization for expenses incurred in the administration and collection of the tax imposed by Section 30123, pursuant to its powers vested by this part, all moneys raised pursuant to the taxes imposed by Section 30123 shall be deposited into the fund as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) Moneys shall be deposited in the fund according to the following formula:

(1) Twenty percent shall be deposited in the Health Education Account.

(2) Thirty-five percent shall be deposited in the Hospital Services Account.

(3) Ten percent shall be deposited in the Physician Services Account.

(4) Five percent shall be deposited in the Research Account.

(5) Five percent shall be deposited in the Public Resources Account.

(6) Twenty-five percent shall be deposited in the Unallocated Account.

(c) Any
 amounts appropriated from any account specified in subdivision (b) which is not encumbered within the period prescribed by law shall revert to the account from which it was appropriated.

(d) This section shall become operative July 1, 1996.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 194, Sec. 4.   Effective July 27, 1995.   Section operative July 1, 1996, by its own provisions.   Note: Section 30124 originally was added on Nov. 8, 1988, by initiative Prop. 99.)
-------------------------------------------

30125.

Funds expended pursuant to this article shall be used only for the purposes expressed in this article and shall be used to supplement existing levels of service and not to fund existing levels of service. The fund and accounts in the fund may be used for loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. The loans shall be repaid with interest from the General Fund at the Pooled Money Investment Account rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 136, Sec. 4.   Effective July 5, 1994.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 1988, by initiative Prop. 99.)
-------------------------------------------

30126.

The annual determination required of the State Board of Equalization pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30123 shall be made based on the wholesale cost of tobacco products as of March 1, and shall be effective during the state’s next fiscal year.

(History: Added November 8, 1988, by initiative Proposition 99.   Operative January 1, 1989, by Section 30128.)
-------------------------------------------

30128.

This article shall take effect on January 1, 1989.

(History: Added November 8, 1988, by initiative Proposition 99.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date for Article 2, commencing with Section 30121.)
-------------------------------------------

30129.

The tax imposed by Section 30123 shall be imposed on every cigarette and tobacco product in the possession or under the control of every dealer and distributor on and after 12:01 a.m. on January 1, 1989, pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the State Board of Equalization.

(History: Added November 8, 1988, by initiative Proposition 99.   Operative January 1, 1989, by Section 30128.)
-------------------------------------------

30130.

This article may be amended only by vote of four-fifths of the membership of both houses of the Legislature. All amendments to this article must be consistent with its purposes.

(History: Added November 8, 1988, by initiative Proposition 99.   Operative January 1, 1989, by Section 30128.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016  [30130.50. - 30130.58.]

30130.50.

Definitions.

For the purposes of this article:

(a) “Cigarette” has the same meaning as that in Section 30003 as it read on January 1, 2015.

(b) “Tobacco products” has the same meaning as that in subdivision (b) of Section
 30121, as amended by this act.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 56, Sec. 4.1.)
-------------------------------------------

30130.51.

California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Cigarette Distribution Tax. 

(a) In addition to any other taxes imposed upon the distribution of cigarettes under this part, there shall be imposed an additional tax upon every distributor of cigarettes at the rate of one hundred mills ($0.100) for each
 cigarette distributed on or after the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 90 days after the effective date of this act.

(b) The board shall adopt regulations providing for the implementation of an equivalent tax on electronic cigarettes as that term is defined in subdivision (c) of Section 30121, and the methods for collection of the tax. Such regulations shall include imposition of an equivalent tax on any device intended to be used to deliver aerosolized or vaporized nicotine to the person inhaling from the device when sold separately or as a package; any component, part, or accessory of such a device that is used during the operation of the device, whether sold separately or as a package with such device; and any liquid or substance containing nicotine, whether sold separately or as a package with any device that would allow it to be inhaled. Such regulations may include, but are not limited to, defining who is a
 distributor of electronic cigarettes pursuant to Section 30011 and the licensing requirements of any such person.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, all revenues resulting from the tax imposed by subdivision (a) and all revenues resulting from the equivalent increase in the tax on tobacco products, including electronic cigarettes, imposed by subdivision (b) of Section 30123, shall be deposited into the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Fund created by Section 30130.53.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 56, Sec. 4.1.)
-------------------------------------------

30130.52.

California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Cigarette Floor Taxes.

(a) (1) In addition to any other tax, every dealer and wholesaler, for the privilege of holding or storing cigarettes for sale, use, or consumption, shall pay a floor stock tax for each cigarette in its possession or
 under its control in this state at 12:01 a.m. on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 90 days after the effective date of this act at the rate of one hundred mills ($0.100) for each cigarette.

(2) Every dealer and wholesaler shall file a return with the board on or before the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 180 days after the effective date of this act on a form prescribed by the board, showing the number of cigarettes in its possession or under its control in this state at 12:01 a.m. on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 90 days after the effective date of this act. The amount of tax shall be computed and shown on the return.

(b) (1) Every licensed cigarette distributor, for the privilege of distributing cigarettes and for holding or storing cigarettes for sale, use, or
 consumption, shall pay a cigarette indicia adjustment tax for each California cigarette tax stamp that is affixed to any package of cigarettes and for each unaffixed California cigarette tax stamp in its possession or under its control at 12:01 a.m. on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 90 days after the effective date of this act at the following rates:

(A) Two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) for each stamp bearing the designation “25.”

(B) Two dollars ($2) for each stamp bearing the designation “20.”

(C) One dollar ($1) for each stamp bearing the designation “10.”

(2) Every licensed cigarette distributor shall file a return with the board on or before the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing 180 days after
 the effective date of this act on a form prescribed by the board, showing the number of stamps described in subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (1). The amount of tax shall be computed and shown on the return.

(c) The taxes required to be paid by this section are due and payable on or before the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing 180 days after the effective date of this act. Payments shall be made by remittances payable to the board and the payments shall accompany the return and forms required to be filed by this section.

(d) Any amount required to be paid by this section that is not timely paid shall bear interest at the rate and by the method established pursuant to Section 30202 from the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing 180 days after the effective date of this act, until paid, and shall be subject to determination, and
 redetermination, and any penalties provided with respect to determinations and redeterminations.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 56, Sec. 4.1.)
-------------------------------------------

30130.53.

California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Fund.

(a) The California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury.

(b) All revenues raised pursuant to the taxes imposed by this
 article, less refunds made pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 30361) of Chapter 6, shall be deposited into the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Fund.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Fund is a trust fund established solely to carry out the purposes of this act and all revenues deposited into the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Fund, together with interest earned by the fund, are hereby continuously appropriated for the purposes of this act without regard to fiscal year and shall be expended only in accordance with the provisions of this act and its purposes.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, revenues deposited into the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Fund, including any interest
 earned by the fund, shall only be used for the specific purposes set forth in this act, and shall be appropriated and expended only for the purposes expressed in this act and shall not be subject to appropriation, reversion, or transfer by the Legislature, the Governor, the Director of Finance, or the Controller for any purpose other than those specified in this act, nor shall such revenues be loaned to the General Fund or any other fund of the state or any local government fund.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 56, Sec. 4.1.)
-------------------------------------------

30130.54.

California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Effect on Tobacco Consumption and Tax Revenue.

(a) The board shall determine within one year of the effective date of this act, and annually thereafter, the effect that the additional taxes imposed on cigarettes by this article, and the resulting increase in the
 tax on tobacco products required by subdivision (b) of Section 30123, have on the consumption of cigarettes and tobacco products in this state. To the extent that a decrease in consumption is determined by the board to be a direct result of the additional tax imposed on cigarettes by this article, and the resulting increase in the tax on tobacco products required by subdivision (b) of Section 30123, the board shall determine the fiscal effect the decrease in consumption has on the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund created by Section 30122 (Proposition 99 as approved by the voters at the November 8, 1988, statewide general election), the Breast Cancer Fund created by Section 30461.6, and the California Children and Families Trust Fund created by Section 30131 (Proposition 10 as approved by the voters at the November 3, 1998, statewide general election), and the revenues derived from Section 30101.

(b) The Controller shall transfer from
 the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Fund to those affected funds described in subdivision (a) the amount necessary to offset the revenue decrease directly resulting from the imposition of additional taxes by this article.

(c) The board shall determine within one year of the effective date of this act, and annually thereafter, the effect, if any, that the additional taxes imposed on cigarettes by this article, and the resulting increase in the tax on tobacco products required by subdivision (b) of Section 30123, have on the consumption of cigarettes and tobacco products in this state, including from the illegal sale of cigarettes and tobacco products. To the extent that there is a loss of state or local government sales and use tax revenues and such loss is determined by the board to be a direct result of the additional tax imposed on cigarettes by this article, and the resulting increase in the tax on
 tobacco products required by subdivision (b) of Section 30123, including from the illegal sale of cigarettes and tobacco products, the board shall determine the fiscal effect on state and local government sales and use tax revenues.

(d) The Controller shall transfer from the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Fund to the general fund of the state and those affected local governments described in subdivision (c) the amount necessary to offset the state and local sales and use tax revenue decrease directly resulting from the imposition of additional taxes by this article, including from the illegal sale of cigarettes and tobacco products.

(e) Transfers under this section shall be made by the Controller at such times as the Controller determines necessary to further the intent of this section.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 56, Sec. 4.1.)
-------------------------------------------

30130.55.

California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Distribution of Revenue.

After deducting and transferring the necessary funds pursuant to Section 30130.54 and subdivisions (a), (b), (c), (d), and (e) of Section 30130.57, the Controller shall annually allocate and transfer the remaining funds in the California Healthcare, Research
 and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Fund as follows:

(a) Eighty-two percent shall be transferred to the Healthcare Treatment Fund, which is hereby created, and shall be used by the State Department of Health Care Services to increase funding for the existing healthcare programs and services described in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) to Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700), inclusive, of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, including those that provide healthcare, treatment, and services for Californians with tobacco-related diseases and conditions, by providing improved payments, for all healthcare, treatment, and services described in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) to Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700), inclusive, of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. To the extent possible given the limits of funding under this article, payments and support for the
 nonfederal share of payments for healthcare, services, and treatment shall be increased based on criteria developed and periodically updated as part of the annual state budget process, provided that these funds shall not be used to supplant existing state general funds for these same purposes. These criteria shall include, but not be limited to, ensuring timely access, limiting specific geographic shortages of services, or ensuring quality care. Consistent with federal law, the funding shall be used to draw down federal funds. The funding shall be used only for care provided by health care professionals, clinics, health facilities that are licensed pursuant to Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, and to health plans contracting with the State Department of Health Care Services to provide health benefits pursuant to this section. The funding can be used for the nonfederal share of payments from governmental entities where applicable. The department shall, if required, seek any necessary federal
 approval for the implementation of this section.

(b) Thirteen percent shall be used for the purpose of funding comprehensive tobacco prevention and control programs, provided that these funds are not to be used to supplant existing state or local funds for these same purposes. These funds shall be apportioned in the following manner:

(1) Eighty-five percent to the State Department of Public Health Tobacco Control Program to be used for the tobacco control programs described beginning at Section 104375 of the Health and Safety Code. The State Department of Public Health shall award funds to state and local governmental agencies, tribes, universities and colleges, community-based organizations, and other qualified agencies for the implementation, evaluation, and dissemination of evidence-based health promotion and health communication activities in order to monitor, evaluate, and
 reduce tobacco and nicotine use, tobacco-related disease rates, and tobacco-related health disparities, and develop a stronger evidence base of effective prevention programming with not less than 15 percent of health promotion, health communication activities, and evaluation and tobacco use surveillance funds being awarded to accelerate and monitor the rate of decline in tobacco-related disparities with the goal of eliminating tobacco-related disparities.

(2) Fifteen percent to the State Department of Education to be used for school programs to prevent and reduce the use of tobacco and nicotine products by young people as described in Section 104420 of the Health and Safety Code with not less than 15 percent of these funds being awarded to accelerate and monitor the rate of decline in tobacco-related disparities for the purpose of eliminating tobacco-related disparities.

(c) Five
 percent to the University of California for medical research of cancer, heart and lung tobacco-related diseases pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 104500) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code to supplement the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Medical Research Program, provided that these funds be used under the following conditions:

(1) The funds shall be used for grants and contracts for basic, applied, and translational medical research in California into the prevention of, early detection of, treatments for, complementary treatments for, and potential cures for all types of cancer, cardiovascular and lung disease, oral disease, and tobacco-related diseases. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the University of California, through the Tobacco Related Disease Research Program, shall have authority to expend funds received under this act for the purposes set forth in this subdivision.

(2) Any grants and contracts awarded shall be awarded using existing medical research program infrastructure and on the basis of scientific merit as determined by an open, competitive peer review process that assures objectivity, consistency, and high quality.

(3) Individuals or entities that receive the grants and contracts pursuant to this subdivision must reside or be located entirely within California.

(4) The research must be performed entirely within California.

(5) The funds shall not be used to supplant existing state or local funds for these same purposes.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 56, Sec. 4.1.)
-------------------------------------------

30130.56.

Independent Audit and Disclosure.

To provide full public accountability concerning the uses to which funds from the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 are put, and to ensure full compliance with the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016:

(a) The nonpartisan California State Auditor shall conduct at least biennially an independent financial audit of the state and local agencies receiving funds pursuant to the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016. An audit conducted pursuant to this section shall include, but not be limited to, a review of the administrative costs expended by the state agencies that administer the fund.

(b) Based on the independent audit, the nonpartisan California State Auditor shall prepare a report detailing its review and include any recommendations for improvements. The report shall be made available to the public.

(c) Each state agency and department receiving funds pursuant to this act shall, on an annual basis, publish on its respective Internet Web site an accounting of how much money was received
 from the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Fund and how that money was spent. The annual accounting shall also be posted on any social media outlets the state agency or department deems appropriate.

(d) The use of the funds received by the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30130.55 shall be subject to the same restrictions, including, but not limited to, audits and prevention of fraud, imposed by existing law.

(e) The use of the funds received by the State Department of Public Health, the State Department of Education, and the University of California pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 30130.55 shall be subject to oversight by the Tobacco Education and Research Oversight Committee pursuant to Sections 104365 and 104370 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 56, Sec. 4.1.)
-------------------------------------------

30130.57.

Implementation and Administrative Costs.

(a) Moneys from the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Fund shall be used to reimburse the board for expenses incurred in the administration, calculation, and collection of the tax imposed by this article and for expenses incurred in the calculation and
 distribution of funds and in the promulgation of regulations as required by this act, provided, however, that after deducting the necessary funds pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30130.54, not more than 5 percent annually of the funds remaining in the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Fund shall be used for such administrative costs.

(b) Moneys from the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Fund shall be used to reimburse the independent nonpartisan California State Auditor up to four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) annually for actual costs incurred to conduct each of the audits required by Section 30130.56 for the purpose of providing public transparency and ensuring that the revenues generated by this article are used for healthcare, tobacco use prevention and research.

(c) Moneys from the
 California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Fund in the amount of forty million dollars ($40,000,000) annually shall be used to provide funding to the University of California for the purpose and goal of increasing the number of primary care and emergency physicians trained in California. This goal shall be achieved by providing this funding to the University of California to sustain, retain, and expand graduate medical education programs to achieve the goal of increasing the number of primary care and emergency physicians in the State of California based on demonstrated workforce needs and priorities.

(1) For the purposes of this subdivision, “primary care” means internal medicine, family medicine, obstetrics/gynecology, and pediatrics.

(2) Funding shall be prioritized for direct graduate medical education costs for programs serving medically
 underserved areas and populations.

(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, all allopathic and osteopathic residency programs accredited by federally recognized accrediting organizations and located in California shall be eligible to apply to receive funding to support resident education in California.

(4) The University of California shall annually review physician shortages by specialty across the state and by region. Based on this review, to the extent that there are demonstrated state or regional shortages of nonprimary care physicians, funds may be used to expand graduate medical education programs that are intended to address such shortages.

(d) Moneys from the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Fund in the amount of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) annually shall be
 used to provide funding to the State Department of Public Health state dental program for the purpose and goal of educating about, preventing and treating dental disease, including dental disease caused by use of cigarettes and other tobacco products. This goal shall be achieved by the program providing this funding to activities that support the state dental plan based on demonstrated oral health needs, prioritizing serving underserved areas and populations. Funded program activities shall include, but not be limited to, the following: education, disease prevention, disease treatment, surveillance, and case management.

The department shall have broad authority to fully implement and effectuate the purposes of this subdivision, including the determination of underserved communities, the development of program protocols, the authority to reimburse state-sponsored services related to the program, and the authority to contract with one or more individuals or public or
 private entities to provide program activities.

(e) Moneys from the California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016 Fund in the amount of forty-eight million dollars ($48,000,000) annually shall be used for the purpose of funding law enforcement efforts to reduce illegal sales of tobacco products, particularly illegal sales to minors; to reduce cigarette smuggling, tobacco tax evasion, the sale of tobacco products without a license and the sale of counterfeit tobacco products; to enforce tobacco-related laws, court judgments, and legal settlements; and to conduct law enforcement training and technical assistance activities for tobacco-related statutes; provided that these funds are not to be used to supplant existing state or local funds for these same purposes. These funds shall be apportioned in the following manner:

(1) Thirty million dollars
 ($30,000,000) annually to the California Department of Justice/Office of the Attorney General to be distributed to local law enforcement agencies to support and hire front-line law enforcement peace officers for programs, including, but not limited to, enforcement of state and local laws related to the illegal sales and marketing of tobacco to minors, and increasing investigative activities and compliance checks to reduce illegal sales of cigarettes and tobacco products to minors and youth.

(2) Six million dollars ($6,000,000) annually to the board to be used to enforce laws that regulate the distribution and retail sale of cigarettes and other tobacco products, such as laws that prohibit cigarette and tobacco product smuggling, counterfeiting, selling untaxed cigarettes and other tobacco products, and selling cigarettes and other tobacco products without a proper license.

(3) Six
 million dollars ($6,000,000) annually to the California Department of Public Health to be used to support programs, including, but not limited to, providing grants and contracts to local law enforcement agencies to provide training and funding for the enforcement of state and local laws related to the illegal sales of tobacco to minors, increasing investigative activities, and compliance checks, and other appropriate activities to reduce illegal sales of tobacco products to minors, including, but not limited to, the Stop Tobacco Access to Kids Enforcement (STAKE) Act, pursuant to Section 22952 of the Business and Professions Code.

(4) Six million dollars ($6,000,000) annually to the California Attorney General to be used for activities, including, but not limited to, enforcing laws that regulate the distribution and sale of cigarettes and other tobacco products, such as laws that prohibit cigarette smuggling, counterfeiting, selling untaxed
 tobacco, selling tobacco without a proper license and selling tobacco to minors, and enforcing tobacco-related laws, court judgments, and settlements.

(f) Not more than 5 percent of the funds received pursuant to this article shall be used by any state or local agency or department receiving such funds for administrative costs.

(g) The California State Auditor shall promulgate regulations pursuant to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to define administrative costs for purposes of this article. Such regulations shall take into account the differing nature of the agencies or departments receiving funds.

(h) The board shall determine beginning two years following the effective date of this
 act, and annually thereafter, any reduction in revenues, following the first year after the effective date of this act, resulting from a reduction in the consumption of cigarettes and tobacco products due to the additional taxes imposed on cigarettes by this article, and the increase in the tax on tobacco products required by subdivision (b) of Section 30123. If the board determines there has been a reduction in revenues, the amount of funds allocated pursuant to subdivisions (c), (d) and (e) shall be reduced proportionately.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 56, Sec. 4.1.)
-------------------------------------------

30130.58.

Statutory References.

Unless otherwise stated, all references in this act refer to statutes as they existed on January 1, 2016.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 56, Sec. 4.1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. California Children and Families Trust Fund Account [30131. - 30131.6.]

30131.

Notwithstanding Section 30122, the California Children and Families Trust Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury for the exclusive purpose of funding those provisions of the California Children and Families Act of 1998 that are set forth in Division 108 (commencing with Section 130100) of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 126, Sec. 8.   Effective July 14, 1999.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 3, 1998, by initiative Prop. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

30131.1.

The following definitions apply for purposes of this article:

(a) “Cigarette” has the same meaning as in Section 30003, as it read on January 1, 1997.

(b) “Tobacco products” shall have the same meaning as in subdivision (b) of Section 30121, as amended by the
 California Healthcare, Research and Prevention Tobacco Tax Act of 2016.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 56, Sec. 3.2.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 1988, by initiative Prop. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

30131.2.

(a) In addition to the taxes imposed upon the distribution of cigarettes by Article 1 (commencing with Section 30101) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 30121) and any other taxes in this chapter, there shall be imposed an additional surtax upon every distributor of cigarettes at the rate of twenty-five mills ($0.025) for each cigarette distributed.

(b) In addition to the taxes imposed upon
 the distribution of tobacco products by Article 1 (commencing with Section 30101) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 30121), and any other taxes in this chapter, there shall be imposed an additional tax upon every distributor of tobacco products, based on the wholesale cost of these products, at a tax rate, as determined annually by the State Board of Equalization, which is equivalent to the rate of tax imposed on cigarettes by subdivision (a).

(c) The wholesale cost used to calculate the amount of tax due under subdivision (b) does not include the wholesale cost of tobacco products that were returned by a customer during the same reporting period in which the tobacco products were distributed, when the distributor refunds the entire amount the customer paid for the tobacco products either in cash or credit. For purposes of this subdivision, refund or credit of the entire amount shall be deemed to be given when the purchase price less
 rehandling and restocking costs is refunded or credited to the customer. The amount withheld for rehandling and restocking costs may be a percentage of the sales price determined by the average cost of rehandling and restocking returned merchandise during the previous accounting cycle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 426, Sec. 3.   Effective October 2, 2001.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 3, 1998, by initiative Prop. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

30131.3.

Except for payments of refunds made pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 30361) of Chapter 6, reimbursement of the State Board of Equalization for expenses incurred in the administration and collection of the taxes imposed by Section 30131.2, and transfers of funds in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 130105 of the Health and Safety Code, all moneys raised pursuant to the taxes imposed by Section 30131.2 shall be deposited in the California Children and Families
 Trust Fund and are continuously appropriated for the exclusive purpose of the California Children and Families Program established by Division 108 (commencing with Section 130100) of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 126, Sec. 9.   Effective July 14, 1999.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 3, 1998, by initiative Prop. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

30131.4.

(a) All moneys raised pursuant to taxes imposed by Section 30131.2 shall be appropriated and expended only for the purposes expressed in the California Children and Families Act, and shall be used only to supplement existing levels of service and not to fund existing levels of
 service. No moneys in the California Children and Families Trust Fund shall be used to supplant state or local General Fund money for any purpose.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and the designation of the California Children and Families Trust Fund as a trust fund, the Controller may use the money raised pursuant to Section 30131.2 for the California Children and Families Trust Fund and all accounts created pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 130105 of the Health and Safety Code for loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. Any such loan shall be repaid from the General Fund with interest computed at 110 percent of the Pooled Money Investment Account rate, with the interest commencing to accrue on the date the loan is made from the fund or account. This subdivision does not authorize any transfer that will interfere with the carrying out of the object for which this fund or
 those accounts were created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 751, Sec. 72.   Effective September 30, 2008.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 3, 1998, by initiative Prop. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

30131.5.

The annual determination required of the State Board of Equalization pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30131.2 shall be made based on the wholesale cost of tobacco products as of March 1, and shall be effective during the state’s next fiscal year.

(History: Added November 3, 1998, by initiative Proposition 10.   Effective (by Sec. 7 of Prop. 10) on date election results were certified.)
-------------------------------------------

30131.6.
